Illinois, session 104th, SB887.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Industrial Hemp Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 89/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Industrial Hemp Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-1091, eff. 8-26-18.)